Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 2. Clerk

§ 5-13-201.
Office created; salary; deputies.

There shall be a clerk of the chancery court for the state of Wyoming. The clerk shall be selected by a majority of justices of the supreme court and shall be an employee of the supreme court. The clerk shall receive an annual salary to be determined by the supreme court which shall be paid in monthly installments in the same manner as other state salaries are paid. The clerk shall perform the duties prescribed by law and the rules adopted by the supreme court.

The clerk of the chancery court may, with the consent of a majority of the justices of the supreme court, appoint a deputy clerk. The deputy may perform all the duties of the office in the name of the clerk and the attestation of the deputy to all decrees, orders and processes, shall have the same effect and force as if issued by the clerk. The deputy clerk shall receive an annual salary to be determined by the supreme court which shall be paid in monthly installments in the same manner as other state salaries are paid.

History.

2019 ch. 200, § 1, effective March 15, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 200 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

§ 5-13-202.
Collection of fees.

The clerk of the chancery court shall collect all fees and charges as required and set by the supreme court under W.S. 5-13-104(b). At the time of the original filing, the clerk also shall collect a court automation fee in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100.00) which shall be deposited into the judicial systems automation account established by W.S.

5-2-120

, and an indigent civil legal services fee in the amount of ten dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited into the indigent civil legal services account established by W.S.

5-2-121

.

History.

2019 ch. 200, § 1, effective March 15, 2019; 2020 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 200 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

§ 5-13-203.
Duties generally.

The clerk shall receive all cases filed with the court and maintain the records of the court. The clerk shall receive, account for and pay over all money that may come into the possession of the court according to law or by rule or order of court. The clerk shall be responsible for publishing the opinions of the court as provided in W.S. 5-13-104(f) and as may be provided for by rule.

History.

2019 ch. 200, § 1, effective March 15, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 200 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.